Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1320.03
Unlawful picketing of a funeral; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of unlawful picketing of a funeral if he or she engages in picketing from one hour prior to through two hours following the commencement of a funeral.

(2) Unlawful picketing of a funeral is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2006, LB 287, § 3.